src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_TONGIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx git plurt
!!€ tongit: tongit+N+Pl+Nom # pliers
!!$ tonki: tongit+N+Sg+Nom
0:gi    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ge     N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0:k     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:gi        N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_SYÖMINGIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx git fornt plurt
!!€ syömingit: syömingit+N+Pl+Nom eating party
!!$ syöminki: syöminki+N+Sg+Nom
0:gi    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:ge     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:gi       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LÄNGET
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx get plurt
!!€ länget: länget+N+Pl+Nom some cowboy accessory thing
!!$ länki: länget+N+Sg+Nom
0:ge    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:k     N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS   ;
0:g     N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS   ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ke    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:k     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:k     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:ki       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ge       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:k        N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LASIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx sit plurt
!!€ lasit: lasit+N+Pl+Nom # glasses
!!$ lasi: lasit+N+Sg+Nom
0:i     N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:e     N_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA    ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;


LEXICON N_BIKINIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx nit plurt
!!€ bikinit: bikinit+N+Pl+Nom # bikini
!!$ bikini: bikinit+N+Sg+Nom
0:i     N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_LIIVIT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx iiiit plurt
!!€ liivit: liivit+N+Pl+Nom # vest
!!$ liivi: liivit+N+Sg+Nom
0:i     N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0:e     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ    ;
0     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:e     N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_HOPEAT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx eat plurt
!!€ hopeat: hopeat+N+Pl+Nom cutlery (silvers)
!!$ hopea: hopeat+N+Sg+Nom
0   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:a   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN     ;
0     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN    ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_TIET
!!€gt-norm: Noun 15 tiet plurt
!!€ tiet: tiet+N+Pl+Nom # roads
!!$ tie: tiet+N+Sg+Nom
0:ie    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:e    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:e    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
0:e    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ie  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ie  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TYÖT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx työt plurt
!!€ työt: työt+N+Pl+Nom # employment
!!$ työ: työt+N+Sg+Nom
0:yö    N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0:ö    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:o    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0:o    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN  ;
0:o    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0:o    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:yö  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:yö  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0:ö   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_VANHEMMAT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx matt plurt
!!€ vanhemmat: vanhemmat+N+Pl+Nom # parents
!!$ vanhempi: vanhemmat+N+Sg+Nom
0:mma   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:p   N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:m    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:p    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:p    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:pa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN    ;
0:p    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:pi  N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ma  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mpa   N_COMPOUND_IN ; ! type ’vanhempain-’ is commoner than -in usually
0:p   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:pa  N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_ITÄMAAT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx maat plurt
!!€ itämaat: itämaat+N+Pl+Nom near east
!!$ itämaa: itämaat+N+Sg+Nom
0:a N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_PUUT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xx puu t plurt
!!€ puut: puut+N+Pl+Nom # trees
!!$ puu: puut+N+Sg+Nom
0 N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:u   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_HÄÄT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx äät plurt
!!€ häät: häät+N+Pl+Nom # wedding
!!$ hää: häät+N+Sg+Nom
0:ä N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT    ;
0 N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0 N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ä   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_TALKOOT
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx kooot plurt
!!€ talkoot: talkoot+N+Pl+Nom house party
!!$ talkoo: talkoot+N+Sg+Nom
0:o N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0   N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:o   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_SAKSET
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx sakset plurt
!!€ sakset: sakset+N+Pl+Nom # scissors
!!$ saksi: sakset+N+Sg+Nom  
0:e   N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0     N_BACK_PLURALS   ;
0     N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_RIPSET
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx ripset plurt
!!€ ripset: ripset+N+Pl+Nom # eyebrows
!!$ ripsi: ripset+N+Sg+Nom
0:e N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0     N_FRONT_PLURALS   ;
0     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0     N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0     N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN   ;
0:i       N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e       N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_KANNET
!!€gt-norm: Noun xxx nnet plurt
!!€ kannet: kannet+N+Pl+Nom # covers
!!$ kansi: kannet+N+Sg+Nom
0:ne    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:ne   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_VUODET
!!€gt-norm: Noun 27 det plurt
!!€ vuodet: vuodet+N+Pl+Nom # years
!!$ vuosi: vuodet+N+Sg+Nom
0:de    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT   ;
0:s N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:t N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:s N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:si   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:t   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_TOIMET
!!€gt-norm: Noun 25 t plurt
!!€ toimet: toimet+N+Pl+Nom # actions
!!$ toimi: toimet+N+Sg+Nom
0:me    N_BACK_PLNOM_CLIT ;
0:m N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:m N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:m N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN   ;
0:n N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN   ;
0:m N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:mi   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:me   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:m   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_HÖYHENET
!!€gt-norm: Noun 32 t plurt
!!€ höyhenet: höyhen+N+Pl+Nom # feathers
!!$ höyhen: höyhenet+N+Sg+Nom
0:e N_FRONT_PLNOM_CLIT  ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:e   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0   N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON  N
alahengitystiet+N:ala#hengityst N_TIET  ;
appivanhemmat+N:appi#vanhem N_VANHEMMAT  ;
asiakirjakannet+N:asia#kirja#kan N_KANNET  ;
bikinit+N:bikin N_BIKINIT  ;
binturongit+N:binturon N_TONGIT  ;
eduskuntavaalit+N:edus#kunta#vaal N_LASIT  ;
eritasonojapuut+N:eri#taso#noja#pu N_PUUT  ;
esivanhemmat+N:esi#vanhem N_VANHEMMAT  ;
eurovaalit+N:euro#vaal N_LASIT  ;
finanssit+N:finanss N_LASIT  ;
geimit+N:geim N_LIIVIT  ;
hajotusvaalit+N:hajotus#vaal N_LASIT  ;
henkselit+N:henksel N_BIKINIT  ;
hopeahäät+N:hopea#hä N_HÄÄT  ;
häät+N:hä N_HÄÄT  ;
iltaravit+N:ilta#rav N_LASIT  ;
irtoripset+N:irto#rips N_RIPSET  ;
isoisovanhemmat+N:iso#iso#vanhem N_VANHEMMAT  ;
isovanhemmat+N:iso#vanhem N_VANHEMMAT  ;
itämaat+N:itä#ma N_ITÄMAAT  ;
juhannustanssit+N:juhannus#tanss N_LASIT  ;
juomingit+N:juomin N_TONGIT  ;
juontosakset+N:juonto#saks N_SAKSET  ;
kahvikestit+N:kahvi#kest N_LIIVIT  ;
kaksiteholasit+N:kaksiteholas N_LASIT  ;
kaksoishäät+N:kaksois#hä N_HÄÄT  ;
kalasakset+N:kala#saks N_SAKSET  ;
kalsongit+N:kalson N_TONGIT  ;
kangaspuut+N:kangas#pu N_PUUT  ;
kasvattivanhemmat+N:kasvatti#vanhem N_VANHEMMAT  ;
kasvatusvanhemmat+N:kasvatus#vanhem N_VANHEMMAT  ;
keimit+N:keim N_LIIVIT  ;
keittiösakset+N:keittiö#saks N_SAKSET  ;
kekkerit+N:kekker N_BIKINIT  ;
kerinpuut+N:kerinpu N_PUUT  ;
kiesit+N:kies N_LIIVIT  ;
kinkerit+N:kinker N_BIKINIT  ;
kirkkohäät+N:kirkko#hä N_HÄÄT  ;
kirkkokahvit+N:kirkko#kahv N_LASIT  ;
kloottikannet+N:klootti#kan N_KANNET  ;
konesakset+N:kone#saks N_SAKSET  ;
konetikapuut+N:kone#tikapu N_PUUT  ;
korukannet+N:koru#kan N_KANNET  ;
kultahäät+N:kulta#hä N_HÄÄT  ;
kuninkuusravit+N:kuninkuus#rav N_LASIT  ;
kynsisakset+N:kynsi#saks N_SAKSET  ;
kynttiläsakset+N:kynttilä#saks N_SAKSET  ;
kääsit+N:kääs N_LIIVIT  ;
köysitikapuut+N:köysi#tikapu N_PUUT  ;
lainahöyhenet+N:laina#höyhen N_HÖYHENET  ;
lankasakset+N:lankasaks N_SAKSET  ;
laskettelulasit+N:laskettelu#las N_LASIT  ;
leggingsit+N:leggings N_LIIVIT  ;
levysakset+N:levy#saks N_SAKSET  ;
liperit+N:liper N_BIKINIT  ;
lukukinkerit+N:luku#kinker N_BIKINIT  ;
luomapuut+N:luoma#pu N_PUUT  ;
LVItyöt+N:LVI#t N_TYÖT  ;
lähilasit+N:lähi#las N_LASIT  ;
länget+N:län N_LÄNGET  ;
maalisvaalit+N:maalis#vaal N_LASIT  ;
metallisakset+N:metalli#saks N_SAKSET  ;
mikrosortsit+N:mikro#sorts N_LASIT  ;
mursunviikset+N:mursun#viiks N_RIPSET  ;
mäkisukset+N:mäki#suks N_SAKSET  ;
nojapuut+N:noja#pu N_PUUT  ;
nyyttärit+N:nyyttär N_BIKINIT  ;
ohimohiukset+N:ohimo#hiuks N_SAKSET  ;
pantalongit+N:pantalon N_TONGIT  ;
paperisakset+N:paperi#saks N_SAKSET  ;
parlamenttivaalit+N:parlamentti#vaal N_LASIT  ;
pensassakset+N:pensas#saks N_SAKSET  ;
perintöhopeat+N:perintö#hope N_HOPEAT  ;
pitkospuut+N:pitkospu N_PUUT  ;
prillit+N:prill N_LIIVIT  ;
protestivaalit+N:protesti#vaal N_LASIT  ;
puhevälit+N:puhe#väl N_LIIVIT  ;
pukeutumistoimet+N:pukeutumis#toi N_TOIMET  ;
putkitongit+N:putki#ton N_TONGIT  ;
puutarhasakset+N:puu#tarha#saks N_SAKSET  ;
päitset+N:päits N_RIPSET  ;
pöytähopeat+N:pöytä#hope N_HOPEAT  ;
ravunsakset+N:ravun#saks N_SAKSET  ;
reivit+N:reiv N_LIIVIT  ;
resurssit+N:resurss N_LASIT  ;
reunavuoret+N:reunavuor N_SAKSET  ;
rillit+N:rill N_LIIVIT  ;
rintaliivit+N:rinta#liiv N_LIIVIT  ;
routavuodet+N:routa#vuo N_VUODET  ;
ruohosakset+N:ruoho#saks N_SAKSET  ;
saunapuut+N:sauna#pu N_PUUT  ;
senssit+N:senss N_LIIVIT  ;
seurakuntavaalit+N:seura#kunta#vaal N_LASIT  ;
siivoustalkoot+N:siivous#talko N_TALKOOT  ;
simpukanpaistokekkerit+N:simpukanpaisto#kekker N_BIKINIT  ;
sokkotreffit+N:sokko#treff N_LIIVIT  ;
sortovuodet+N:sorto#vuo N_VUODET  ;
sortsit+N:sorts N_LASIT  ;
suitset+N:suits N_SAKSET  ;
synttärit+N:synttär N_BIKINIT  ;
syömingit+N:syömin N_SYÖMINGIT  ;
sävärit+N:sävär N_BIKINIT  ;
säästötalkoot+N:säästö#talko N_TALKOOT  ;
talkoot+N:talko N_TALKOOT  ;
tanssihäät+N:tanssihä N_HÄÄT  ;
tekoripset+N:teko#rips N_RIPSET  ;
tikapuut+N:tikapu N_PUUT  ;
timanttihäät+N:timantti#hä N_HÄÄT  ;
tongit+N:ton N_TONGIT  ;
toukotyöt+N:touko#t N_TYÖT  ;
treffit+N:treff N_LIIVIT  ;
tukkisakset+N:tukki#saks N_SAKSET  ;
tuplatreffit+N:tupla#treff N_LIIVIT  ;
uimalasit+N:uima#las N_LASIT  ;
vaihdevuodet+N:vaihde#vuo N_VUODET  ;
ylähengitystiet+N:ylä#hengityst N_TIET  ;
äitiysliivit+N:äitiys#liiv N_LIIVIT  ;
ämmänlänget+N:ämmän#län N_LÄNGET  ;
